North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 6. Communicable Diseases.
§ 130A-150.
Statewide surveillance and reporting system.

By December 31, 2011, the Department, in consultation with the State HAI Advisory Group and in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, shall establish a statewide surveillance and reporting system for
specified health care-associated infections.

The Commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement the statewide surveillance and reporting system established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. The rules shall specify uniform standards for surveillance and reporting of specified health
care-associated infections under the statewide surveillance and reporting system. The uniform standards shall include at least all of the following:

A preference for electronic surveillance of specified health care-associated infections to the greatest extent practicable.

A requirement for electronic reporting of specified health care-associated infections.

Each hospital, as defined in G.S. 131E-76(3), is subject to the statewide surveillance and reporting system established in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and shall be responsible for health care-associated infections surveillance and reporting
of specified health care-associated infections data to the Department through the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention National Health Care Safety Network.

The Department shall release to the public aggregated and provider-specific data on health care-associated infections that does not contain social security numbers or other personal identifying information only if it deems the release of this data to
be reliable and necessary to protect the public’s health.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12A.8(d), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
2011-386, ss. 1, 2; 2013-360, s. 12A.8(d).

§ 130A-151.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Immunization.

§ 130A-152.
Immunization required.

Every child present in this State shall be immunized against diphtheria, tetanus, whooping cough, poliomyelitis, red measles (rubeola) and rubella. In addition, every child present in this State shall be immunized against any other disease upon a determination
by the Commission that the immunization is in the interest of the public health. Every parent, guardian, person in loco parentis and person or agency, whether governmental or private, with legal custody of a child shall have the
responsibility to ensure that the child has received the required immunization at the age required by the Commission. If a child has not received the required immunizations by the specified age, the responsible person shall obtain
the required immunization for the child as soon as possible after the lack of the required immunization is determined.

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-179, s. 10, effective October 1, 2002.

The Commission shall adopt and the Department shall enforce rules concerning the implementation of the immunization program. The rules shall provide for:

The child’s age at administration of each vaccine;

The number of doses of each vaccine;

Exemptions from the immunization requirements where medical practice suggests that immunization would not be in the best health interests of a specific category of children;

The procedures and practices for administering the vaccine; and

Redistribution of vaccines provided to local health departments.

(c1) The Commission for Public Health shall, pursuant to

G.S. 130A-152

and

G.S. 130A-433

, adopt rules establishing reasonable fees for the administration of vaccines and rules limiting the requirements that can be placed on children, their parents, guardians, or custodians as a condition
for receiving vaccines provided by the State. These rules shall become effective January 1, 1994.

Only vaccine preparations which meet the standards of the United States Food and Drug Administration or its successor in licensing vaccines and are approved for use by the Commission may be used.

When the Commission requires immunization against a disease not listed in paragraph (a) of this section, or requires an additional dose of a vaccine, the Commission is authorized to exempt from the new requirement children who are or who have been enrolled
in school (K-12) on or before the effective date of the new requirement.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1971, c. 191; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 632, s. 1; 1975, c. 84; 1977, c. 160; 1979, c. 56, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 158; 1993, c. 321, s. 281(a); 2002-179, s. 10; 2007-182, s. 2.

§ 130A-153.
Obtaining immunization; reporting by local health departments; access to immunization information in patient records; immunization of minors.

The required immunization may be obtained from a physician licensed to practice medicine, from a local health department, or in the case of a person at least 18 years of age, from an immunizing pharmacist. Local health departments shall administer required
and State-supplied immunizations at no cost to uninsured or underinsured patients with family incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level. A local health department may redistribute these vaccines only
in accordance with the rules of the Commission.

Local health departments shall file monthly immunization reports with the Department. The report shall be filed on forms prepared by the Department and shall state, at a minimum, each patient’s age and the number of doses of each type of vaccine administered.

Immunization certificates and information concerning immunizations contained in medical or other records shall, upon request, be shared with the Department, local health departments, an immunizing pharmacist, and the patient’s attending physician. In
addition, an insurance institution, agent, or insurance support organization, as those terms are defined in

G.S. 58-39-15

, may share immunization information with the Department. The Commission may, for the purpose of assisting the Department in enforcing this Part, provide by rule that other persons may have access to immunization
information, in whole or in part.

A physician or local health department may immunize a minor with the consent of a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the minor. A physician or local health department may also immunize a minor who is presented for immunization by
an adult who signs a statement that he or she is authorized by a parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the minor to obtain the immunization for the minor.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 177; 1965, c. 652; 1971, c. 191; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1979, c. 56, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 743, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 134, s. 1; 1999-110, s. 2; 2009-451, s. 10.29A(a); 2010-31, s.
10.13(b); 2013-246, s. 5.

§ 130A-154.
Certificate of immunization.

A physician or local health department administering a required vaccine shall give a certificate of immunization to the person who presented the child for immunization. The certificate shall state the name of the child, the name of the child’s parent,
guardian, or person responsible for the child obtaining the required immunization, the address of the child and the parent, guardian or responsible person, the date of birth of the child, the sex of the child, the number of doses
of the vaccine given, the date the doses were given, the name and address of the physician or local health department administering the required immunization and other relevant information required by the Commission.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person who received immunizations in a state other than North Carolina shall present an official certificate or record of immunization to the child care facility, school (K-12), or college or university.
This certificate or record shall state the person’s name, address, date of birth, and sex; the type and number of doses of administered vaccine; the dates of the first MMR and the last DTP and polio; the name and address of the
physician or local health department administering the required immunization; and other relevant information required by the Commission.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 177; 1965, c. 652; 1971, c. 191; 1979, c. 56, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1999-110, s. 3.

§ 130A-155.
Submission of certificate to child care facility, preschool and school authorities; record maintenance; reporting.

No child shall attend a school (pre K-12), whether public, private or religious, a child care facility as defined in

G.S. 110-86(3)

, unless a certificate of immunization indicating that the child has received the immunizations required by

G.S. 130A-152

is presented to the school or facility. The parent, guardian, or responsible person must present a certificate of immunization on the child’s first day of attendance to the principal of the school or operator of
the facility, as defined in

G.S. 110-86(7)

. If a certificate of immunization is not presented on the first day, the principal or operator shall present a notice of deficiency to the parent, guardian or responsible person. The parent, guardian or responsible
person shall have 30 calendar days from the first day of attendance to obtain the required immunization for the child. If the administration of vaccine in a series of doses given at medically approved intervals requires a period
in excess of 30 calendar days, additional days upon certification by a physician may be allowed to obtain the required immunization. Upon termination of 30 calendar days or the extended period, the principal or operator shall not
permit the child to attend the school or facility unless the required immunization has been obtained.

The school or child care facility shall maintain on file immunization records for all children attending the school or facility which contain the information required for a certificate of immunization as specified in

G.S. 130A-154

. These certificates shall be open to inspection by the Department and the local health department during normal business hours. When a child transfers to another school or facility, the school or facility which
the child previously attended shall, upon request, send a copy of the child’s immunization record at no charge to the school or facility to which the child has transferred.

The school shall file an annual immunization report with the Department by November 1. The child care facility shall file an immunization report annually with the Department. The report shall be filed on forms prepared by the Department and shall state
the number of children attending the school or facility, the number of children who had not obtained the required immunization within 30 days of their first attendance, the number of children who received a medical exemption and
the number of children who received a religious exemption.

Any adult who attends school (pre K-12), whether public, private or religious, shall obtain the immunizations required in

G.S. 130A-152

and shall present to the school a certificate in accordance with this section. The physician or local health department administering a required vaccine to the adult shall give a certificate of immunization to the
person. The certificate shall state the person’s name, address, date of birth and sex; the number of doses of the vaccine given; the date the doses were given; the name and addresses of the physician or local health department
administering the required immunization; and other relevant information required by the Commission.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 177; 1965, c. 652; 1971, c. 191; 1973, c. 632, s. 2; 1979, c. 56, s. 1; 1981, c. 44; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-506, s. 47; 1999-110, s. 4; 2007-187, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-187, s. 2, effective July 8, 2007, in the first sentence of subsection (c), deleted “Within 60 calendar days after the commencement of a new school year” at the beginning, inserted “annual” near the middle, and added “by November 1.”
at the end.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Children We Abandon: Religious Exemptions to Child Welfare and Educational Laws as Denials of Equal Protection to Children of Religious Objectors,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1321 (1996).

For article, “The Religious Exemption Loophole: A Building Public Health Crisis in North Carolina,” see 98 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 59 (2020).

§ 130A-155.1.
Submission of certificate to college or universities.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall attend a college or university, whether public, private, or religious, unless a certificate of immunization or a record of immunization from a high school located in North Carolina indicating
that the person has received immunizations required by

G.S. 130A-152

is presented to the college or university. The person shall present a certificate or record of immunization on or before the date the person first registers for a quarter or semester during which the student will
reside on the campus or first registers for more than four traditional day credit hours to the registrar of the college or university. If a certificate or record of immunization is not in the possession of the college or university
on the date of first registration, the college or university shall present a notice of deficiency to the student. The student shall have 30 calendar days from the date of the student’s first registration to obtain the required
immunization. If immunization requires a series of doses and the period necessary to give the vaccine at standard intervals extends beyond the date of the first registration, the student shall be allowed to attend the college or
university upon written certification by a physician that the standard series is in progress. The physician shall state the time period needed to complete the series. Upon termination of this time period, the college or university
shall not permit the student to continue in attendance unless the required immunization has been obtained.

The college or university shall maintain on file immunization records for all students attending the school which contain the information required for a certificate of immunization as specified in

G.S. 130A-154

. These certificates shall be open to inspection by the Department and the local health department during normal business hours. When a student transfers to another college or university, the college or university
which the student previously attended shall, upon request, send a copy of the student’s immunization record at no charge to the college or university to which the student has transferred.

Within 60 calendar days after the commencement of a new school year, the college or university shall file an immunization report with the Department. The report shall be filed on forms prepared by the Department and shall state the number of students
attending the school or facility, the number of students who had not obtained the required immunization within 30 days of their first attendance, the number of students who received a medical exemption and the number of students
who received a religious exemption.

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-110, s. 5.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

Educational institutions established under Chapter 115D of the General Statutes.

Students residing off-campus and registering for any combination of:

Off-campus courses.

Evening courses.

Weekend courses.

No more than four traditional day credit hours in on-campus courses.

History.
1985, c. 692, s. 1; 1987, c. 782, s. 17; 1991, c. 381, s. 1; 1999-110, s. 5; 2007-99, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-99, s. 1, effective June 20, 2007, substituted “student” for “person” and variations throughout the section; in subsection (a), substituted “section” for “subsection,” deleted the former second sentence which read: “This section shall
not apply to educational institutions established under Chapter 115D of the General Statutes, or to students registering only in off-campus courses, or to students attending night or weekend classes only, or to students taking a course
load of four credit hours or less and residing off campus,” and inserted “traditional day” preceding “credit hours” in the second sentence; and added subsection (e).

§ 130A-156.
Medical exemption.

The Commission for Public Health shall adopt by rule medical contraindications to immunizations required by

G.S. 130A-152

. If a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State certifies that a required immunization is or may be detrimental to a person’s health due to the presence of one of the contraindications adopted by the Commission,
the person is not required to receive the specified immunization as long as the contraindication persists. The State Health Director may, upon request by a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State, grant a medical exemption
to a required immunization for a contraindication not on the list adopted by the Commission.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 177; 1965, c. 652; 1971, c. 191; 1979, c. 56, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 782, s. 18; 1989, c. 122; 1999-110, s. 6; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” at the beginning of the section.

§ 130A-157.
Religious exemption.

If the bona fide religious beliefs of an adult or the parent, guardian or person in loco parentis of a child are contrary to the immunization requirements contained in this Chapter, the adult or the child shall be exempt from the requirements. Upon submission
of a written statement of the bona fide religious beliefs and opposition to the immunization requirements, the person may attend the college, university, school or facility without presenting a certificate of immunization.

History.
1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 177; 1965, c. 652; 1971, c. 191; 1979, c. 56, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 692, s. 2; 2002-179, s. 17.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Children We Abandon: Religious Exemptions to Child Welfare and Educational Laws as Denials of Equal Protection to Children of Religious Objectors,” see 74 N.C.L. Rev. 1321 (1996).

For article, “The Religious Exemption Loophole: A Building Public Health Crisis in North Carolina,” see 98 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 59 (2020).

§ 130A-158.
Restitution required when vaccine spoiled due to provider negligence.

Immunization program providers shall be liable for restitution to the State for the cost of replacement vaccine when vaccine in the provider’s inventory has become spoiled or unstable due to the provider’s negligence and unreasonable failure to properly
handle or store the vaccine.

History.
2001-424, s. 21.86(a).

§ 130A-159.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Venereal Disease.

§§ 130A-160 through 130A-166.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 225, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the duty of local health departments to provide free examination and treatment for tuberculosis and sexually transmitted diseases designated by the Commission, see

G.S. 130A-144(e)

.

§§ 130A-167 through 130A-170.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Inflammation of Eyes of Newborn.

§§ 130A-171 through 130A-174.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 225, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the duty of local health departments to provide free examination and treatment for tuberculosis and sexually transmitted diseases designated by the Commission, see

G.S. 130A-144(e)

.

§§ 130A-175,
130A-176.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Tuberculosis.

§§ 130A-177,
130A-178.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 225, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to the duty of local health departments to provide free examination and treatment for tuberculosis and sexually transmitted diseases designated by the Commission, see

G.S. 130A-144(e)

.

§ 130A-179.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 782, s. 20.

§§ 130A-180 through 130A-183.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Rabies.

§ 130A-184.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Part:

Animal Control Officer. — A city or county employee whose responsibility includes animal control. The term “Animal Control Officer” also includes agents of a private organization that is operating an animal shelter under contract with a city or county
whenever those agents are performing animal control functions at the shelter.

Cat. — A domestic feline of the genus and species Felis catus.

Certified rabies vaccinator. — A person appointed and certified to administer rabies vaccine to animals in accordance with this Part.

Dog. — A domestic canine of the genus, species, and subspecies Canis lupus familiaris.

(4a)
Feral. — An animal that is not socialized.

(4b)
Ferret. — A domestic mammal of the genus, species, and subspecies Mustela putorius furo.

Rabies vaccine. — An animal rabies vaccine licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture and approved for use in this State by the Commission.

State Public Heath Veterinarian. — A person appointed by the Secretary to direct the State public health veterinary program.

(6a)
Stray. — An animal that meets both of the following conditions:

Is beyond the limits of confinement or lost.

Is not wearing any tags, microchips, tattoos, or other methods of identification.

Vaccination. — The administration of rabies vaccine by a person authorized to administer it under

G.S. 130A-185

.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 1; 1949, c. 645, s. 1; 1953, c. 876, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-304, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-304, s. 2, effective January 1, 2010, added the last sentence of subdivision (1).

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009, rewrote this section.

§ 130A-185.
Vaccination required.

Vaccination required. — The owner of an animal listed in this subsection over four months of age shall have the animal vaccinated against rabies:

Cat.

Dog.

Ferret.

Vaccination. — Only animal rabies vaccine licensed by the United States Department of Agriculture and approved by the Commission shall be used on animals in this State. A rabies vaccine may only be administered by one or more of the following:

A licensed veterinarian.

A registered veterinary technician under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian.

A certified rabies vaccinator.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 1; 1941, c. 259, s. 2; 1953, c. 876, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 2, effective October 1, 2009, rewrote this section.

§ 130A-186.
Appointment and certification of certified rabies vaccinator.

In those counties where licensed veterinarians are not available to participate in all scheduled county rabies control clinics, the local health director shall appoint one or more persons for the purpose of administering rabies vaccine to animals in that
county. Whether or not licensed veterinarians are available, the local health director may appoint one or more persons for the purpose of administering rabies vaccine to animals in their county and these persons will make themselves
available to participate in the county rabies control program. The State Public Health Veterinarian shall provide at least four hours of training to those persons appointed by the local health director to administer rabies vaccine.
Upon satisfactory completion of the training, the State Public Health Veterinarian shall certify in writing that the appointee has demonstrated a knowledge and procedure acceptable for the administration of rabies vaccine to animals.
A certified rabies vaccinator shall be authorized to administer rabies vaccine to animals in the county until the appointment by the local health director has been terminated.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 3; 1941, c. 259, s. 3; 1953, c. 876, s. 3; 1957, c. 1357, s. 4; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-187.
County rabies vaccination clinics.

Local Clinics. — The local health director shall organize or assist other county departments to organize at least one countywide rabies vaccination clinic per year for the purpose of vaccinating animals required to be vaccinated under this Part. Public
notice of the time and place of rabies vaccination clinics shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation within the area.

Fee. — The county board of commissioners may establish a fee to be charged for a rabies vaccination given at a county rabies vaccination clinic. The fee amount may consist of the following:

A charge for administering and storing the vaccine, not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00).

The actual cost of the rabies vaccine, the vaccination certificate, and the rabies vaccination tag.

History.
1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 219; 2009-327, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 3, effective October 1, 2009, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a); in subsection (a), added the subsection catchline, and substituted “animals required to be vaccinated under this Part” for “dogs and
cats”; and added subsection (b).

§ 130A-188.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-327, s. 4, effective October 1, 2009.

§ 130A-189.
Rabies vaccination certificates.

A person who administers a rabies vaccine shall complete a rabies vaccination certificate. The Commission shall adopt rules specifying the information that must be included on the certificate. An original rabies vaccination certificate shall be given
to the owner of the animal that receives the rabies vaccine. A copy of the rabies vaccination certificate shall be retained by the licensed veterinarian or the certified rabies vaccinator. A copy shall also be given to the county agency
responsible for animal control, provided the information given to the county agency shall not be used for commercial purposes.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 6; 1941, c. 259, s. 5; 1959, c. 352; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1993, c. 245, s. 1; 2009-327, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 5, effective October 1, 2009, in the first sentence, substituted “person who administers a rabies vaccine shall complete a” for “licensed veterinarian or a certified rabies vaccinator who administers rabies vaccine to a dog or
cat shall complete a three-copy”; added the second sentence; in the third sentence, substituted “An” for “The” at the beginning, “the animal” for “each dog or cat” near the middle, and inserted “the” near the end; in the third sentence,
substituted “A copy” for “One copy” at the beginning; and in the last sentence, substituted “A copy shall also” for “The other copy shall” at the beginning.

§ 130A-190.
Rabies vaccination tags.

Issuance. — A person who administers a rabies vaccine shall issue a rabies vaccination tag to the owner of the animal. The rabies vaccination tag shall show the year issued, a vaccination number, the words “North Carolina” or the initials “N.C.” and
the words “rabies vaccine.” Dogs shall wear rabies vaccination tags at all times. Cats and ferrets must wear rabies vaccination tags unless they are exempt from wearing the tags by local ordinance.

Fee. — Rabies vaccination tags, links, and rivets may be obtained from the Department of Health and Human Services. The Secretary is authorized to collect a fee for the rabies tags, links, and rivets in accordance with this subsection. The fee for each
tag is the sum of the following:

The actual cost of the rabies tag, links, and rivets.

Transportation costs.

Fifteen cents (15¢). This portion of the fee shall be used to fund rabies education and prevention programs.

Repealed by Session Laws 2010-31, s. 11.4(h), effective October 1, 2010.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-487, s. 1, effective January 1, 2008.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 6; 1941, c. 259, s. 5; 1959, c. 352; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1997-69, s. 1; 2000-163, s. 2; 2007-487, s. 1; 2009-327, s. 6; 2010-31, s. 11.4(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-487, s. 1, effective January 1, 2008, added “Issuance” at the beginning of subsection (a); rewrote subsection (b); and repealed former subsection (c) which pertained to special edition rabies tags.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 6, effective October 1, 2009, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “person who administers a rabies vaccine” for “licensed veterinarian or a certified rabies vaccinator who administers rabies vaccine to a dog
or cat” at the beginning; in the third sentence, deleted “and cats” following “Dogs”; and rewrote the last sentence.

Session Laws 2010-31, s. 11.4(h), effective October 1, 2010, in the introductory paragraph in subsection (b), added “of Health and Human Services” at the end of the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “authorized to collect a fee”
for “authorized to establish by rule a fee”; in subdivision (b)(3), substituted “Fifteen cents (15¢)” for “Five cents (5¢)”; and deleted subdivision (b)(4), which read: “Twenty cents (20¢). This portion of the fee shall be credited
to the Spay/Neuter Account established in

G.S. 19A-62

and used to fund statewide spay/neuter programs. This portion of the fee shall not be imposed for tags provided to persons who operate establishments primarily for the purpose of boarding or training hunting dogs or who
own and vaccinate 10 or more dogs per year.”

§ 130A-191.
Possession and distribution of rabies vaccine.

It shall be unlawful for persons other than licensed veterinarians, certified rabies vaccinators and persons engaged in the distribution of rabies vaccine to possess rabies vaccine. Persons engaged in the distribution of vaccines may distribute, sell
and offer to sell rabies vaccine only to licensed veterinarians and certified rabies vaccinators.

History.
1987, c. 218, s. 1.

§ 130A-192.
Animals not wearing required rabies vaccination tags.

The Animal Control Officer shall canvass the county to determine if there are any animals not wearing the required rabies vaccination tag. If an animal required to wear a tag is found not wearing one, the Animal Control Officer shall check to see if the
owner’s identification can be found on the animal. If the animal is wearing an owner identification tag with information enabling the owner of the animal to be contacted, or if the Animal Control Officer otherwise knows who the
owner is, the Animal Control Officer shall notify the owner in writing to have the animal vaccinated against rabies and to produce the required rabies vaccination certificate to the Animal Control Officer within three days of the
notification. If the animal is not wearing an owner identification tag and the Animal Control Officer does not otherwise know who the owner is, the Animal Control Officer may impound the animal. The duration of the impoundment
of these animals shall be established by the county board of commissioners, but the duration shall not be less than 72 hours. During the impoundment period, the Animal Control Officer shall make a reasonable effort to locate the
owner of the animal. If the Animal Control Officer has access at no cost or at a reasonable cost to a microchip scanning device, the Animal Control Officer shall scan the animal and utilize any information that may be available
through a microchip to locate the owner of the animal, if possible. If the animal is not reclaimed by its owner during the impoundment period, the animal shall be disposed of in one of the following manners: returned to the owner;
adopted as a pet by a new owner; or put to death by a procedure approved by rules adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services or, in the absence of such rules, by a procedure approved by the American Veterinary
Medical Association, the Humane Society of the United States or of the American Humane Association.

(a1) Before an animal may be put to death, it shall be made available for adoption as provided in

G.S. 19A-32.1

.

(a2) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-377, s. 3, effective July 29, 2013.

(a3) The Animal Control Officer shall maintain a record of all animals impounded under this section which shall include the date of impoundment, the length of impoundment, the method of disposal of the animal and the name of the person or institution
to whom any animal has been released.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-377, s. 3, effective July 29, 2013.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 8; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-304, s. 1; 2009-327, s. 7; 2013-377, s. 3.

§ 130A-193.
Vaccination and confinement of animals brought into this State.

Vaccination Required. — An animal brought into this State that is required to be vaccinated under this Part shall immediately be securely confined and shall be vaccinated against rabies within one week after entry. The animal shall remain confined for
two weeks after vaccination.

Exceptions. — The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:

An animal brought into this State for exhibition purposes if the animal is confined and not permitted to run at large.

An animal brought into this State accompanied by a certificate issued by a licensed veterinarian showing that the animal is apparently free from and has not been exposed to rabies and that the animal is currently vaccinated against rabies.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 11; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 8, effective October 1, 2009, in the section catchline, substituted “animals” for “dogs or cats”; in subsection (a), added the subsection catchline, and in the first sentence, substituted “An animal” for “A dog or cat”, and inserted
“that is required to be vaccinated under this Part”; in subsection (b), added the subsection catchline; in subdivision (b)(1), substituted “An animal” for “A dog or cat”, at the beginning, and deleted “or” from the end; and in subdivision
(b)(2), substituted “An animal” for “A dog or cat” at the beginning, “animal” for “dog or cat” near the middle, and “animal is currently vaccinated against rabies” for “dog or cat has received rabies vaccine within the past year” at
the end.

§ 130A-194.
Quarantine of districts infected with rabies.

An area may be declared under quarantine against rabies by the local health director when the disease exists to the extent that the lives of persons are endangered. When quarantine is declared, each animal in the area that is required to be vaccinated
under this Part shall be confined on the premises of the owner or in a veterinary hospital unless the animal is on a leash or under the control and in the sight of a responsible adult.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 12; 1941, c. 259, s. 9; 1949, c. 645, s. 3; 1953, c. 876, s. 8; 1957, c. 1357, s. 8; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 9, effective October 1, 2009, in the second sentence, substituted “animal in the area that is required to be vaccinated under this Part” for “dog and cat in the area” near the beginning, “hospital unless the animal is” for “hospital.
However, dogs or cats” near the middle, and deleted “may be permitted to leave the premises of the owner or the veterinary hospital” from the end.

§ 130A-195.
Destroying stray or feral animals in quarantine districts.

When quarantine has been declared and stray or feral animals continue to run uncontrolled in the area, any peace officer or Animal Control Officer shall have the right, after reasonable effort has been made to apprehend the animals, to destroy the stray
or feral animals and properly dispose of their bodies.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 13; 1953, c. 876, s. 9; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2009-327, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 10, effective October 1, 2009, in the section catchline, substituted “stray or feral animals” for “stray dogs and cats”, in the first sentence, substituted “stray or feral animals” for “dogs and cats”, and in the last sentence,
substituted “stray or feral animals” for “uncontrolled dogs and cats.”

§ 130A-196.
Notice and confinement of biting animals.

Notice. — When a person has been bitten by an animal required to be vaccinated under this Part, the person or parent, guardian or person standing in loco parentis of the person, and the person owning the animal or in control or possession of the animal
shall notify the local health director immediately and give the name and address of the person bitten and the owner of the animal. If the animal that bites a person is a stray or feral animal, the local agency responsible for animal
control shall make a reasonable attempt to locate the owner of the animal. If the owner cannot be identified within 72 hours of the event, the local health director may authorize the animal be euthanized, and the head of the animal
shall be immediately sent to the State Laboratory of Public Health for rabies diagnosis. If the event occurs on a weekend or State holiday the time period for owner identification shall be extended 24 hours.A physician who attends
a person bitten by an animal known to be a potential carrier of rabies shall report the incident within 24 hours to the local health director. The report must include the name, age, and sex of the person.

Confinement. — When an animal required to be vaccinated under this Part bites a person, the animal shall be immediately confined for 10 days in a place designated by the local health director. The local health director may authorize a dog trained and
used by a law enforcement agency to be released from confinement to perform official duties upon submission of proof that the dog has been vaccinated for rabies in compliance with this Part. After reviewing the circumstances of
the particular case, the local health director may allow the owner to confine the animal on the owner’s property. An owner who fails to confine an animal in accordance with the instructions of the local health director shall be
guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. If the owner or the person who controls or possesses the animal that has bitten a person refuses to confine the animal as required by this subsection, the local health director may order seizure
of the animal and its confinement for 10 days at the expense of the owner.

History.
1935, c. 122, s. 17; 1941, c. 259, s. 11; 1953, c. 876, s. 13; 1957, c. 1357, s. 9; 1977, c. 628; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 674; 1989, c. 298; 1993, c. 539, s. 950; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2009-327, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-327, s. 11, effective October 1, 2009, rewrote the section.